Hawaii, session 2026, SB3245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  The department of human services shall set the minimum certification periods for supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits households to twelve months; provided that for households in which all adult members are sixty years of age or older, the certification periods shall be twenty-four months at a minimum. (b) The department of human services shall participate in the elderly simplified application project of the supplemental nutrition assistance program to simplify eligibility determinations for eligible households.  Participation in the elderly simplified application project shall include: (1)  Establishing recertification periods of at least thirty-six months for households composed entirely of adults sixty years of age or older or adults with disabilities; and (2)  Waiving the recertification interview for eligible households, to the extent allowed by federal law. (c) The department of human services shall seek any necessary federal approvals or waivers to implement this Act and shall promptly amend its rules, policies, and procedures to effectuate the intent of this Act. (d) The department of human services shall submit reports of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2029 and 2030.  The reports shall include: (1)  Data on the implementation and utilization of the supplemental nutrition assistance program and elderly simplified application project, including the number and characteristics of participating households; (2)  Administrative cost savings or changes; and (3)  Analysis of the participation rates. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on January 30, 2050; provided that section 1 shall take effect on July 1, 2028.